District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-4602

Testimony; production of books; immunity of witness.

Repealed.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1176, Ch. 672, ch. VI, § 2
Oct. 13, 1970, Pub. L. 91-452, title II, § 254, 84 Stat. 931
1973 Ed., § 35-802.